Maine, session 132, LD1743.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2011, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 359, is amended to
read:
3. Exception. This section does not prohibit an order, ordinance, rule or regulation of
any political subdivision which that, with the exception of appropriate civil penalty
provisions, conforms exactly with any applicable provision of state law or which; that
regulates the discharge of firearms within a jurisdiction; or that regulates the possession of
firearms within a municipality's buildings and voting places and at municipal public
proceedings within a municipality in accordance with Title 30-A, section 3015.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §3015 is enacted to read:
§3015. Regulation of firearms within municipality's buildings and voting places and
at municipal public proceedings
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with this section,
a municipality may adopt an order, ordinance, policy or regulation that limits or prohibits
the possession of firearms within the municipality's buildings and voting places and at
municipal public proceedings within the municipality.
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Firearm" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 12-A.
B. "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2,
subsection 17.
C. "Municipal public proceeding" means the transactions of any functions affecting
any citizens of the State by any board, commission, agency or authority of any
municipality or other political or administrative subdivision of a municipality.
D. "Voting place" has the same meaning as in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 49.
2. Scope. An order, ordinance, policy or regulation adopted by a municipality pursuant
to this section must designate by common name and physical address all buildings and
voting places to which the order, ordinance, policy or regulation applies, which may include
buildings owned, leased, rented or otherwise occupied by the municipality and buildings
used temporarily as voting places or as venues for its municipal public proceedings held
within the municipality. Use of such buildings, or part of such buildings, by other private
or public entities does not preclude the applicability of the order, ordinance, policy or
regulation. For a municipal public proceeding that is conducted in a part of a nonmunicipal
building, the limitation or prohibition does not extend to those nonmunicipal parts or users
of the building. The order, ordinance, policy or regulation may impose a civil penalty of
not more than $1,000 per violation of the order, ordinance, policy or regulation.
3. Exceptions. An order, ordinance, policy or regulation adopted by a municipality
pursuant to this section must provide an exception to allow a federal, state, county or local
law enforcement officer to possess a firearm in the municipality's buildings and its voting
places and at municipal public proceedings and may not regulate the possession of a firearm
on school property in a manner that conflicts with the prohibition in Title 20-A, section
6552.
Page 1 - 132LR0932(01)

4. Posting. If a municipality adopts an order, ordinance, policy or regulation pursuant
to this section, it shall post, in a prominent location outside of all buildings and other places
to which the order, ordinance, policy or regulation applies, notice of the limitation or
prohibition against the possession of firearms, including any adopted exceptions to the
limitation or prohibition.